Florida, session 2026, SB110.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 10 11 Section 1.âSubsection (1) of section 196.041, Florida 12 Statutes, is amended to read: 13 196.041âExtent of homestead exemptions.â 14 (1)âVendees in possession of real estate under bona fide 15 contracts to purchase when such instruments, under which they 16 claim title, are recorded in the office of the clerk of the 17 circuit court where said properties lie, and who reside thereon 18 in good faith and make the same their permanent residence; 19 persons residing on real estate by virtue of dower or other 20 estates therein limited in time by deed, will, jointure, or 21 settlement; and lessees owning the leasehold interest in a bona 22 fide lease having an original term of 98 years or more in a 23 residential parcel or in a condominium parcel as defined in 24 chapter 718, even if such lease contains a provision terminating 25 the leasehold interest upon the death of the lessees, or persons 26 holding leases of 50 years or more, existing prior to June 19, 27 1973, for the purpose of homestead exemptions from ad valorem 28 taxes and no other purpose, shall be deemed to have legal or 29 beneficial and equitable title to said property. In addition, a 30 tenant-stockholder or member of a cooperative apartment 31 corporation who is entitled solely by reason of ownership of 32 stock or membership in the corporation to occupy for dwelling 33 purposes an apartment in a building owned by the corporation, 34 for the purpose of homestead exemption from ad valorem taxes and 35 for no other purpose, is deemed to have beneficial title in 36 equity to said apartment and a proportionate share of the land 37 on which the building is situated. 38 Section 2.âThe amendment made by this act to s. 196.041, 39 Florida Statutes, is remedial and clarifying in nature. 40 Section 3.âThis act shall take effect upon becoming a law.